Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.210

Burden of proof in transactions between spouses or domestic partners.

In every case, where any question arises as to the good faith of any transaction between spouses or between domestic partners, whether a transaction between them directly or by intervention of third person or persons, the burden of proof shall be upon the party asserting the good faith.

[ 2008 c 6 s 619; Code 1881 s 2397; RRS s 5828.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.